District of Columbia statutes.
24-601

Purpose.

The purpose of this subchapter is to establish a comprehensive program in the District of Columbia for the prevention of alcoholism and the rehabilitation of alcoholics, discourage abuse of alcoholic beverages, and provide for medical, psychiatric, and other scientific treatment of chronic alcoholics; to minimize the deleterious effects of excessive drinking; to reduce the financial burden imposed upon the people of the District of Columbia by the abusive use of alcoholic beverages, as is reflected in accidents, inefficiency of personnel, and absenteeism; and to establish methods of handling intoxication and alcoholism that will benefit the individual involved and more fully protect the public. In order to accomplish this purpose and alleviate intoxication and chronic alcoholism, all public officials in the District of Columbia shall take cognizance of the fact that public intoxication shall be handled as a public health problem rather than as a criminal offense, and that a chronic alcoholic is a sick person who needs, is entitled to, and shall be provided appropriate medical, psychiatric, institutional, advisory, and rehabilitative treatment services of the highest caliber for his illness.

Aug. 4, 1947, 61 Stat. 744, ch. 472, § 1
Aug. 3, 1968, 82 Stat. 618, Pub. L. 90-452, § 3(a)
1981 Ed., § 24-521.
1973 Ed., § 24-521.